apertium-nn-nb.nn.dix
<pardef n="l/ide__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>idi</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>iden</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idd</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idd</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ide</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idi</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idt</l>   <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idde</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idne</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idde</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idne</l>  <r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idande</l><r>ide<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>id</l>    <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ida</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>idast</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idd</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ide</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idi</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>idt</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>id</l>    <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eid</l>   <r>ide<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="kv/ede__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>edi</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eden</l>  <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edi</l>   <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edne</l>  <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edne</l>  <r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edande</l><r>ede<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>    <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eda</l>   <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>   <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>edast</l> <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ede</l>   <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>edi</l>   <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ed</l>    <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ad</l>    <r>ede<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="s/eie__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>agd</l>   <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>   <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>  <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agde</l>  <r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiande</l><r>eie<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l>ei</l>    <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>eia</l>   <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eie</l>   <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eiast</l> <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>agt</l>   <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>eier</l>  <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>agde</l>  <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>a</l>     <r>eie<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>
<pardef n="l/yte__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>oti</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="f"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>oten</l>  <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yta</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ytt</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ote</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oti</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yta</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ytt</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otne</l>  <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yta</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ytte</l>  <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>otne</l>  <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yta</l>   <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ytte</l>  <r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytande</l><r>yte<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e r="LR"><p><l>yta</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yte</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yt</l>    <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yta</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yte</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ytast</l> <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>ote</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>oti</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yta</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ytt</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ytar</l>  <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yter</l>  <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>yt</l>    <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>aut</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>yta</l>   <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ytte</l>  <r>yte<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

<pardef n="tem/me__vblex_adj">
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="mf"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="nt"/><s n="sg"/><s n="ind"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="pl"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pp"/><s n="sg"/><s n="def"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mande</l> <r>me<s n="adj"/><s n="pprs"/></r></p></e>

  <e>       <p><l></l>      <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="imp"/></r></p></e>
  <e r="LR"><p><l>ma</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>me</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mast</l>  <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="inf"/><s n="pass"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>t</l>     <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pp"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>mer</l>   <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pres"/></r></p></e>
  <e>       <p><l>te</l>    <r>me<s n="vblex"/><s n="pret"/></r></p></e>
</pardef>

    <e lm="lyte">        <i>l</i><par n="l/yte__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="forglømme">   <i>forgløm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="overflømme">  <i>overfløm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="glømme">      <i>gløm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
<e lm="seie">            <i>s</i><par n="s/eie__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="dagdrømme"><i>dagdrøm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="drømme"><i>drøm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="flømme"><i>fløm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gjennomstrømme"><i>gjennomstrøm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="gjømme"><i>gjøm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="kvede"><i>kv</i><par n="kv/ede__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="lide"><i>l</i><par n="l/ide__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="strømme"><i>strøm</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
    <e lm="temme"><i>tem</i><par n="tem/me__vblex_adj"/></e>
